Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1039
School funds; apportionment; duties.

After making the apportionment pursuant to section 79-1037, the county treasurer shall (1) enter the apportionment immediately in a book kept for that purpose, (2) furnish the secretary of each school district in the county a certificate showing the amount due such district, and (3) distribute the funds to each district in the amount due such district for its share of the apportionment.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XI, § 7, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 6934;

C.S.1922, § 6517;

C.S.1929, § 79-2006;

R.S.1943, § 79-2006;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 381, p. 820;

Laws 1951, c. 288, § 1, p. 955;

Laws 1989, LB 487, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1306;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 685;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 98.